Illinois, session 104th, SB2713.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)8    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 9    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 10record that contains information that is exempt from 11disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 12that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 13to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 14shall make the remaining information available for inspection 15and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 16be exempt from inspection and copying: 17        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 18    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 19    regulations implementing federal or State law. 20        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 21    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 22    or a court order. 23        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases   SB2713 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 2    specifically designed to provide information to one or 3    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 4    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 5        (c) Personal information contained within public 6    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 7    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 8    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 9    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 10    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 11    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 12    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 13    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 14    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 15    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 16    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 17    privacy. 18        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 19    created in the course of administrative enforcement 20    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 21    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 22    extent that disclosure would: 23            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 24        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 25        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 26        agency that is the recipient of the request;   SB2713 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1            (ii) interfere with active administrative 2        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 3        that is the recipient of the request; 4            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 5        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 6        hearing; 7            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 8        confidential source, confidential information 9        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 10        who file complaints with or provide information to 11        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 12        penal agencies; except that the identities of 13        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 14        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 15        local government, except when disclosure would 16        interfere with an active criminal investigation 17        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 18        request; 19            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 20        techniques other than those generally used and known 21        or disclose internal documents of correctional 22        agencies related to detection, observation, or 23        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 24        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 25        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 26        request;   SB2713 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 2        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 3            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 4        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 5        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 6    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 7    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 8    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 9    request did not create the record, did not participate in 10    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 11    of the record, and only has access to the record through 12    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 13    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 14    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 15    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.16        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 17    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 18    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 19    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 20    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 21    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 22    Board. 23        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 24    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 25    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 26        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of   SB2713 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 2        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 5    materials are available in the library of the correctional 6    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 7    confined. 8        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 9    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 11    materials include records from staff members' personnel 12    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 13    information. 14        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 15    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 17    through an administrative request to the Department of 18    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 19    Mental Health. 20        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 21    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 22    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 23    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 24    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 25    institution or facility.26        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail   SB2713 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 2    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 3    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 4    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 5    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 6    or school address, work telephone number, social security 7    number, or any other identifying information, except as 8    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 9    or claim. 10        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 11    requested by a person committed to the Department of 12    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 13    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 14    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 15    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 16    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 17    claim. 18        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 19    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 20    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 21    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 22    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 23    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 24    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 25    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 26    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents.   SB2713 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 2    information obtained from a person or business where the 3    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 4    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 5    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 6    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 7    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 8    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 9    requested.10        The information included under this exemption includes 11    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 12    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 13    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 14    company within the investment portfolio of a private 15    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 16    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 17    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 18    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 19    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 20    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 21    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 22    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 24    privately held company may cause competitive harm.25        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 26    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting   SB2713 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    to disclosure. 2        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 3    agreement, including information which if it were 4    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 5    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 6    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 7    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 8    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 9    award or final selection is made. 10        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 11    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 12    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 13    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 14    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 15    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 16    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 17    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 18    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 19    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 20    legal rights of the general public. 21        (j) The following information pertaining to 22    educational matters:23            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 24        examination data used to administer an academic 25        examination; 26            (ii) information received by a primary or   SB2713 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        secondary school, college, or university under its 2        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 3        their academic peers; 4            (iii) information concerning a school or 5        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 6        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 7        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and8            (iv) course materials or research materials used 9        by faculty members. 10        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 11    submissions, and other construction related technical 12    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 13    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 14    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 15    including, but not limited to, power generating and 16    distribution stations and other transmission and 17    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 18    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 19    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 20    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 21    security. 22        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 23    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 24    public body makes the minutes available to the public 25    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 26        (m) Communications between a public body and an   SB2713 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 2    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 3    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 4    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 5    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 6    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 7    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 8        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 9    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 10    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 11    cases in which discipline is imposed. 12        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 13    with automated data processing operations, including, but 14    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 15    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 16    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 17    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 18    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 19    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 20    security of the system or its data or the security of 21    materials exempt under this Section. 22        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 23    between public bodies and their employees or 24    representatives, except that any final contract or 25    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 26        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other   SB2713 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 2    an applicant for a license or employment. 3        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 4    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 5    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 6    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 7    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 8    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 9    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 10    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 11    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 12    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 13    until a sale is consummated. 14        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 15    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 16    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 17    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 18    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 19    intergovernmental risk management association or 20    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 21    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 22        (t) Information contained in or related to 23    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 24    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 25    for the regulation or supervision of financial 26    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit   SB2713 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 2    law. 3        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 4    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 5    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 6    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 7    Electronic Transactions Act. 8        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 9    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 10    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 11    community's population or systems, facilities, or 12    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 13    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 14    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 15    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 16    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 17    include such things as details pertaining to the 18    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 19    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 20    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 21        (w) (Blank). 22        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 23    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 24    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 25    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 26    Illinois Power Agency.   SB2713 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 2    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 3    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 4    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 5    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 6    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 7    Commission. 8        (z) Information about students exempted from 9    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 10    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 11    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 12    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 13    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 14        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 15    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 16        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 17    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 18    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 19    Mortality Review Team Act. 20        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 21    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 22    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 23    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.24        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 25    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 26    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of   SB2713 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 2        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 3    information of persons who are minors and are also 4    participants and registrants in programs of park 5    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 6    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 7    associations.8        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 9    information of participants and registrants in programs of 10    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 11    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 12    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 13    minors.14        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 15    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 16    2012. 17        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 18    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 19    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 20    School Code and any information contained in that report. 21        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 22    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 23    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 24    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 25    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 26    library of the facility where the individual is confined;   SB2713 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 2    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 3    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 4    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 5    Corrections.6        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 7    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 8        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 9    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 10    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 11    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 12    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 13    of a governmental entity or a person. 14        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 15    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 16    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 17    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 18    the procedure.19        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 20    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 21    Confidential Reporting Act. 22        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 23    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 24    Act. 25        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 26    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections.   SB2713 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 2    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 3    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 4    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 5    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 6    Act.7        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 8    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 9        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 10    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 11        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 12    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 13    protected health information, including demographic 14    information, that may be contained within or extracted 15    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 16    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 17    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 18    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 19    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 20    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 21    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 22    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 23    160.103. 24        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 25    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 26    competitive bidding requests by the Department of   SB2713 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 2        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 3    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 4    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 5    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 6    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 7    include information classified as safeguards, 8    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 9    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 10    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 11    security advisories, and other applicable communications 12    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 13    security sensitive information. 14        (vv) Records described in Section 25.1 of the Health 15    Care Violence Prevention Act. 16    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 17Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 18prior to disclosure under this Act. 19    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 20Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 21public records prior to disclosure under this Act.22    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 23paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 24redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 25Act.26    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a   SB2713 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 2agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 3behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 4governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 5Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 6for purposes of this Act. 7    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 8information or limit the availability of records to the 9public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 10in this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 131-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 14eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 15revised 1-7-26.) 16    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)17    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 18    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 19record that contains information that is exempt from 20disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 21that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 22to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 23shall make the remaining information available for inspection 24and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 25be exempt from inspection and copying:   SB2713 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 2    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 3    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 4    individual case file information; individual investigation 5    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 6    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 7    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 8    training materials; records related to attorney 9    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 10    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 11    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 12    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records, 13    such as general case processing and workload information. 14        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 15    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 16    regulations implementing federal or State law. 17        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 18    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 19    or a court order. 20        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 21    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 22    specifically designed to provide information to one or 23    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 24    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 25        (c) Personal information contained within public 26    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a   SB2713 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 2    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 3    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 4    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 5    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 6    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 7    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 8    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 9    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 10    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 11    privacy. 12        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 13    created in the course of administrative enforcement 14    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 15    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 16    extent that disclosure would: 17            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 18        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 19        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 20        agency that is the recipient of the request; 21            (ii) interfere with active administrative 22        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 23        that is the recipient of the request; 24            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 25        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 26        hearing;   SB2713 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 2        confidential source, confidential information 3        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 4        who file complaints with or provide information to 5        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 6        penal agencies; except that the identities of 7        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 8        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 9        local government, except when disclosure would 10        interfere with an active criminal investigation 11        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 12        request; 13            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 14        techniques other than those generally used and known 15        or disclose internal documents of correctional 16        agencies related to detection, observation, or 17        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 18        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 19        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 20        request; 21            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 22        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 23            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 24        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 25        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 26    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic   SB2713 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 2    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 3    request did not create the record, did not participate in 4    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 5    of the record, and only has access to the record through 6    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 7    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 8    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 9    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.10        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 11    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 12    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 13    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 14    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 15    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 16    Board. 17        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 18    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 19    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 20        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 21    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 22        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 25    materials are available in the library of the correctional 26    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is   SB2713 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    confined. 2        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 5    materials include records from staff members' personnel 6    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 7    information. 8        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 9    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 11    through an administrative request to the Department of 12    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 13    Mental Health. 14        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 15    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 17    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 18    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 19    institution or facility.20        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 21    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 22    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 23    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 24    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 25    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 26    or school address, work telephone number, social security   SB2713 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    number, or any other identifying information, except as 2    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 3    or claim. 4        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 5    requested by a person committed to the Department of 6    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 7    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 8    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 9    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 10    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 11    claim. 12        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 13    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 14    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 15    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 16    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 17    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 18    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 19    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 20    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 21        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 22    information obtained from a person or business where the 23    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 24    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 25    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 26    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would   SB2713 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 2    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 3    requested.4        The information included under this exemption includes 5    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 6    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 7    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 8    company within the investment portfolio of a private 9    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 10    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 11    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 12    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 13    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 14    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 15    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 16    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 17    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 18    privately held company may cause competitive harm.19        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 20    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 21    to disclosure. 22        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 23    agreement, including information which if it were 24    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 25    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 26    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection   SB2713 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 2    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 3    award or final selection is made. 4        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 5    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 6    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 7    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 8    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 9    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 10    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 11    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 12    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 13    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 14    legal rights of the general public. 15        (j) The following information pertaining to 16    educational matters:17            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 18        examination data used to administer an academic 19        examination; 20            (ii) information received by a primary or 21        secondary school, college, or university under its 22        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 23        their academic peers; 24            (iii) information concerning a school or 25        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 26        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would   SB2713 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and2            (iv) course materials or research materials used 3        by faculty members. 4        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 5    submissions, and other construction related technical 6    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 7    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 8    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 9    including, but not limited to, power generating and 10    distribution stations and other transmission and 11    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 12    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 13    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 14    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 15    security. 16        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 17    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 18    public body makes the minutes available to the public 19    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 20        (m) Communications between a public body and an 21    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 22    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 23    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 24    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 25    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 26    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with   SB2713 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 2        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 3    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 4    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 5    cases in which discipline is imposed. 6        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 7    with automated data processing operations, including, but 8    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 9    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 10    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 11    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 12    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 13    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 14    security of the system or its data or the security of 15    materials exempt under this Section. 16        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 17    between public bodies and their employees or 18    representatives, except that any final contract or 19    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 20        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 21    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 22    an applicant for a license or employment. 23        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 24    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 25    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 26    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually   SB2713 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 2    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 3    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 4    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 5    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 6    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 7    until a sale is consummated. 8        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 9    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 10    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 11    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 12    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 13    intergovernmental risk management association or 14    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 15    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 16        (t) Information contained in or related to 17    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 18    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 19    for the regulation or supervision of financial 20    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 21    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 22    law. 23        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 24    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 25    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 26    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform   SB2713 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    Electronic Transactions Act. 2        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 3    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 4    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 5    community's population or systems, facilities, or 6    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 7    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 8    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 9    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 10    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 11    include such things as details pertaining to the 12    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 13    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 14    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 15        (w) (Blank). 16        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 17    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 18    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 19    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 20    Illinois Power Agency. 21        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 22    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 23    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 24    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 25    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 26    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce   SB2713 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    Commission. 2        (z) Information about students exempted from 3    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 4    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 5    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 6    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 7    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 8        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 9    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 10        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 11    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 12    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 13    Mortality Review Team Act. 14        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 15    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 16    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 17    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.18        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 19    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 20    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 21    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 22        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 23    information of persons who are minors and are also 24    participants and registrants in programs of park 25    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 26    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation   SB2713 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    associations.2        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 3    information of participants and registrants in programs of 4    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 5    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 6    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 7    minors.8        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 9    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 10    2012. 11        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 12    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 13    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 14    School Code and any information contained in that report. 15        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 16    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 17    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 18    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 19    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 20    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 21    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 22    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 23    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 24    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 25    Corrections.26        (jj) Confidential information described in Section   SB2713 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 2        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 3    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 4    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 5    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 6    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 7    of a governmental entity or a person. 8        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 9    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 10    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 11    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 12    the procedure.13        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 14    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 15    Confidential Reporting Act. 16        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 17    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 18    Act. 19        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 20    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 21        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 22    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 23    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 24    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 25    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 26    Act.  SB2713 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 2    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 3        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 4    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 5        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 6    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 7    protected health information, including demographic 8    information, that may be contained within or extracted 9    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 10    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 11    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 12    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 13    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 14    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 15    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 16    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 17    160.103. 18        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 19    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 20    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 21    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 22        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 23    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 24    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 25    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 26    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents   SB2713 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    include information classified as safeguards, 2    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 3    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 4    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 5    security advisories, and other applicable communications 6    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 7    security sensitive information. 8        (vv) Records described in Section 25.1 of the Health 9    Care Violence Prevention Act. 10    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 11Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 12prior to disclosure under this Act. 13    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 14Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 15public records prior to disclosure under this Act.16    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 17paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 18redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 19Act.20    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 21public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 22agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 23behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 24governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 25Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 26for purposes of this Act.   SB2713 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 2information or limit the availability of records to the 3public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 4in this Act. 5(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 71-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 8eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 9104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 10    Section 5. The Health Care Violence Prevention Act is 11amended by changing Sections 5, 15, and 20 and by adding 12Sections 25.1 and 25.2 as follows: 13    (210 ILCS 160/5)14    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Committed person" means a person who is in the custody of 16or under the control of a custodial agency, including, but not 17limited to, a person who is incarcerated, under arrest, 18detained, or otherwise under the physical control of a 19custodial agency.20    "Custodial agency" means the Illinois Department of 21Corrections, the Illinois State Police, the sheriff of a 22county, a county jail, a correctional institution, or any 23other State agency, municipality, or unit of local government 24that employs personnel designated as police, peace officers,   SB2713 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1wardens, corrections officers, or guards or that employs 2personnel vested by law with the power to place or maintain a 3person in custody.4    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 5    "Emergency department" means the physical section of a 6health care provider in which emergency medical care is 7provided pursuant to the Hospital Emergency Services Act. 8    "Health care provider" means a retail health care 9facility, a hospital subject to the Hospital Licensing Act or 10the University of Illinois Hospital Act, or a veterans home as 11defined in the Department of Veterans Affairs Act.12    "Health care worker" means nursing assistants and other 13support personnel, any individual licensed under the laws of 14this State to provide health services, including but not 15limited to: dentists licensed under the Illinois Dental 16Practice Act; dental hygienists licensed under the Illinois 17Dental Practice Act; nurses and advanced practice registered 18nurses licensed under the Nurse Practice Act; occupational 19therapists licensed under the Illinois Occupational Therapy 20Practice Act; optometrists licensed under the Illinois 21Optometric Practice Act of 1987; pharmacists licensed under 22the Pharmacy Practice Act; physical therapists licensed under 23the Illinois Physical Therapy Act; physicians licensed under 24the Medical Practice Act of 1987; physician assistants 25licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987; 26podiatric physicians licensed under the Podiatric Medical   SB2713 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1Practice Act of 1987; clinical psychologists licensed under 2the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act; clinical social 3workers licensed under the Clinical Social Work and Social 4Work Practice Act; speech-language pathologists and 5audiologists licensed under the Illinois Speech-Language 6Pathology and Audiology Practice Act; or hearing instrument 7dispensers licensed under the Hearing Instrument Consumer 8Protection Act, or any of their successor Acts.9    "Nurse" means a person who is licensed to practice nursing 10under the Nurse Practice Act.11    "Retail health care facility" means an institution, place, 12or building, or any portion thereof, that:13        (1) is devoted to the maintenance and operation of a 14    facility for the performance of health care services and 15    is located within a retail store at a specific location;16        (2) does not provide surgical services or any form of 17    general anesthesia;18        (3) does not provide beds or other accommodations for 19    either the long-term or overnight stay of patients; and20        (4) discharges individual patients in an ambulatory 21    condition without danger to the continued well-being of 22    the patients and transfers non-ambulatory patients to 23    hospitals.24    "Retail health care facility" does not include hospitals, 25long-term care facilities, ambulatory treatment centers, blood 26banks, clinical laboratories, offices of physicians, advanced   SB2713 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1practice registered nurses, podiatrists, and physician 2assistants, and pharmacies that provide limited health care 3services. 4(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 5    (210 ILCS 160/15)6    Sec. 15. Workplace safety.7    (a) A health care worker who contacts law enforcement or 8files a report with law enforcement against a patient or 9individual because of workplace violence shall provide notice 10to management of the health care provider by which he or she is 11employed within 3 days after contacting law enforcement or 12filing the report.13    (b) No management of a health care provider may discourage 14a health care worker from exercising his or her right to 15contact law enforcement or the Department or file a report 16with law enforcement because of workplace violence.17    (c) A health care provider that employs a health care 18worker shall display a notice, either by physical or 19electronic means, stating that verbal aggression will not be 20tolerated and physical assault will be reported to law 21enforcement.22    (d) The health care provider shall offer immediate 23post-incident services for a health care worker directly 24involved in a workplace violence incident caused by patients 25or their visitors, including acute treatment and access to   SB2713 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1psychological evaluation.2    (e) No health care provider may maintain a policy that 3limits the type of workplace violence about which a health 4care worker may contact law enforcement or file a report with 5law enforcement or the Department. 6(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 7    (210 ILCS 160/20)8    Sec. 20. Workplace violence prevention program. 9    (a) A health care provider shall create a workplace 10violence prevention program that complies with the 11Occupational Safety and Health Administration guidelines for 12preventing workplace violence for health care and social 13service workers as amended or updated by the Occupational 14Safety and Health Administration.15    (a-5) In addition, the workplace violence prevention 16program shall include: 17        (1) the following classifications of workplace 18    violence as one of 4 possible types: 19            (A) "Type 1 violence" means workplace violence 20        committed by a person who has no legitimate business 21        at the work site and includes violent acts by anyone 22        who enters the workplace with the intent to commit a 23        crime. 24            (B) "Type 2 violence" means workplace violence 25        directed at employees by customers, clients, patients,   SB2713 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1        students, inmates, visitors, or other individuals 2        accompanying a patient. 3            (C) "Type 3 violence" means workplace violence 4        against an employee by a present or former employee, 5        supervisor, or manager. 6            (D) "Type 4 violence" means workplace violence 7        committed in the workplace by someone who does not 8        work there, but has or is known to have had a personal 9        relationship with an employee; 10        (2) management commitment and worker participation, 11    including, but not limited to, nurses; 12        (3) worksite analysis and identification of potential 13    hazards; 14        (4) hazard prevention and control; 15        (5) safety and health training with required hours 16    determined by rule; and 17        (6) a system for employees to report incidents of type 18    2 violence to the health care provider; and19        (7) (6) recordkeeping and evaluation of the violence 20    prevention program. 21    (b) The Department of Public Health may by rule adopt 22additional criteria for workplace violence prevention 23programs.24(Source: P.A. 100-1051, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 25    (210 ILCS 160/25.1 new)  SB2713 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1    Sec. 25.1. Recordkeeping. 2    (a) On or before November 30, 2027, the Department shall, 3by rule, develop and publish in a publicly accessible format a 4template or form for health care providers to use to log type 2 5violent incidents occurring in the emergency department. No 6later than 3 months after the Department publishes the 7template or form, health care providers shall log type 2 8violent incidents using the template or form. The template or 9form shall include, at a minimum:10        (1) the violent incident, including environmental risk 11    factors present at the time of the incident;12        (2) the date and time of the incident and the job 13    titles of involved employees;14        (3) the names and addresses of the perpetrators of 15    such violent incidents, if known; 16        (4) the nature and extent of injuries to employees and 17    patients who were impacted; and18        (5) how the incident was abated or addressed in 19    addition to those actions required by Sections 15 and 20.20    (b) Records maintained in accordance with this Section are 21confidential and not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 22of Information Act. 23    (210 ILCS 160/25.2 new)24    Sec. 25.2. Reporting. 25    (a) On or before May 31, 2028, and on or before May 31 of   SB2713 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1each year thereafter, each health care provider shall prepare 2and submit to the Department an aggregate deidentified summary 3of the type 2 violent incidents logged as specified in 4subsection (a) of Section 25.1 for the preceding calendar 5year. The report shall be completed on a form provided by the 6Department and, at a minimum, include:7        (1) the total number of type 2 violent incidents;8        (2) the total number of recordable injuries related to 9    the type 2 incidents; and10        (3) a summary of how the health care provider has, 11    during the past year, engaged in violence prevention 12    activities as set forth in this Act and, if applicable, 13    any additional actions taken to address the type 2 violent 14    incidents summarized in the report.15    (b) The Department shall provide an annual aggregated and 16deidentified report to the General Assembly summarizing the 17reports received. When deidentifying data, the Department 18shall remove all identifying data related to the patients 19impacted, the health care provider employees involved, and the 20health care provider. Such deidentification shall be done in 21accordance with 45 CFR 164.514.22    (c) On or before July 15, 2028, and on or before July 15 of 23each year thereafter, the Department shall notify any health 24care provider that has failed to submit a summary report as 25required by subsection (a). A health care provider receiving 26such a notice shall have 30 calendar days to submit the summary   SB2713 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 15448 BAB 28604 b1report. The Department may impose a fine of up to $500 per day 2until the health care provider submits the summary report.  3    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 4changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 5that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 6represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 7not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 8made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 9Public Act. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2027.